Hawaii statutes.
§428-205 Signing of records. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record to be filed by or on
behalf of a limited liability company in the office of the director shall be
certified and signed by a:

(1) Manager of a manager-managed company or, in the
case of a foreign limited liability company, a person who is authorized or
required to sign a record under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization;

(2) Member of a member-managed company or, in the
case of a foreign limited liability company, a person who is authorized or
required to sign a record under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization;

(3) Person organizing the company, if the company has
not been formed; or

(4) Fiduciary, if the company is in the hands of a
receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary.

(b) The signer of a record to be filed under
subsection (a) may do so as an attorney-in-fact by stating beneath or opposite
the signature the name of the person for whom the signer is the
attorney-in-fact. The power of attorney need not be filed with the record. [L
1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §91; am L 2012, c 58, §20; am L 2012, c
58, §20]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next